Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 14

Arkansas Time-Share Act

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-6 may not apply to subchapter 7 which was enacted subsequently.

Publisher's Notes.

This chapter was based on the Model Real Estate Time-Share Act.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 294, § 6-106: Mar. 25, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the protection of the residents of this State that provision be made for the sale and regulation of Time-Share Intervals by the Real Estate Commission; that this Act is designed to provide for such regulation and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 765, § 8: Mar. 24, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of Act 294 of 1983 relating to the regulation of real estate time-share intervals by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission are in urgent need of revision to enable the Commission to effectively and efficiently administer the provisions of the Act; that this Act is designed to make the necessary revisions and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-14-101. Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Time-Share Act”.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 1, § 1-101; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1301; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment made stylistic changes.

18-14-102. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)

“Accommodation” means an apartment, condominium or cooperative unit, cabin, lodge, hotel or motel room, or other private or commercial structure that:

(A)

Is affixed to real property;

(B)

Is designed for occupancy or use by one (1) or more individuals; and

(C)

Is part of a time-share plan;

(2)

“Acquisition agent” means a person that by telephone, inducement, solicitation, or otherwise in the ordinary course of business directly tries to encourage a person in this state to attend a sales presentation for a time-share plan;

(3)

“Amenities” means a recreational facility made available to purchasers in a time-share plan;

(4)

“Association” means a council or an association composed of the owners of time-share interests in a time-share plan;

(5)(A)

“Broker” means a person that sells or offers to sell in the ordinary course of business, time-share interests in a time-share plan to a purchaser.

(B)

A broker and a sales agent conducting business from a location in this state, whether on a temporary or ongoing basis, are subject to the Real Estate Law, §17-42-101 et seq.

(C)

A violation that results from a time-share activity is not subject to the Real Estate Law, §17-42-401 et seq.;

(6)(A)

“Component site” means a specific geographic location where accommodations that are part of a multisite time-share plan are located.

(B)

Separate phases of a single time-share property in a specific geographic location under common management are considered a single component site;

(7)(A)

“Developer” means:

(i)

A person who establishes a time-share plan, or is in the business of selling time-share interests or that uses a broker to sell time-share interests; or

(ii)

A person that succeeds in the developer's interest by sale, lease, assignment, mortgage, or other transfer, if the person:

(a)

Offers at least twelve (12) time-share interests in a particular time-share plan; and

(b)

Is in the business of selling time-share interests or uses a broker to sell time-share interests.

(B)

“Developer” does not include a broker who is in the business of selling time-share interests;

(8)

“Exchange agent” means a person that owns or operates an exchange program;

(9)

“Exchange program” means a method, arrangement, or procedure for the voluntary exchange of time-share interests among time-share owners;

(10)

“Managing agent” means a person responsible for operating and maintaining a time-share property or time-share plan on behalf of the association;

(11)(A)

“Offering” means an offer to sell, a solicitation, an inducement, or an advertisement made in this state, whether directly or indirectly or by radio, television, newspaper, magazine, mail, or electronic media, in which a person is given an opportunity or encouraged to acquire a time-share interest.

(B)

“Offering” does not include a time-share owner that may refer a person to a developer if the time-share owner's activities are limited to the referral of a prospective purchaser to the developer, the time-share owner receives nominal consideration, and does not refer more than twenty (20) prospective purchasers to the developer annually;

(12)

“Person” means one (1) or more natural persons, corporations, partnerships, associations, trusts, other entities, or any combination thereof;

(13)

“Project instrument” means a time-share instrument or other applicable document that establishes a time-share plan that contains restrictions or covenants to regulate the use, occupancy, or disposition of a time-share plan, including a declaration, rule, or an amendment thereto, of a condominium, and the articles of incorporation, bylaws, rules of an association, or an amendment thereto;

(14)

“Public offering statement” means the statement under §18-14-404;

(15)

“Purchaser” means a person other than a developer or lender who acquires an interest in a time-share plan;

(16)(A)

“Reservation system” means the method, arrangement, or procedure where a purchaser is required to compete with other purchasers to reserve an accommodation of a multisite time-share plan for one (1) or more time-share periods regardless of whether the reservation system is operated and maintained by the multisite time-share plan, a managing entity, an exchange company, or other person.

(B)

If a purchaser is required to use an exchange program as the principal means of reserving an accommodation and facility of the plan, the arrangement is a reservation system.

(C)

If the exchange company uses a mechanism to exchange time-share periods among members of the exchange program, the use of the mechanism is not a reservation system in a multistate time-share plan;

(17)(A)

“Time-share estate” means an arrangement by which the purchaser receives a right to occupy a time-share property, together with a real estate interest in the time-share property.

(B)

“Time-share estate” includes real property interests held in a trust in which the owners or the owners' association of the time-share plan are the express beneficiaries of that trust and the trustee is independent of the developer.

(C)

If the real property interests are held in a trust, the conveyance of the real property to the trust shall be free of financial liens and encumbrances or include a recorded nondisturbance agreement;

(18)

“Time-share instrument” means a master deed, master lease, declaration, or other instrument used to establish a time-share plan;

(19)

“Time-share interest” means a time-share estate or a time-share use;

(20)(A)

“Time-share plan” means an arrangement, plan, scheme, or similar method, excluding an exchange program but including a membership agreement, sale, lease, deed, license, or right-to-use agreement, in which a purchaser, in exchange for consideration, receives an ownership right in or the right to use the accommodations for a period of time less than a year during a given year, but not necessarily consecutive years, regardless of whether the period of time is determined in advance.

(B)

A time-share plan may be either a:

(i)

“Single site time-share plan” which is the right to use an accommodation at a single time-share property; or

(ii)

“Multisite time-share plan” which includes:

(a)

A “specific time-share interest” which is the right to use an accommodation at a specific time-share property, together with the use rights in accommodations at one (1) or more other component sites established by or acquired through the reservation system of the time-share plan; or

(b)

A “nonspecific time-share interest” which is the right to use accommodations at more than one (1) component site established by or acquired through the reservation system of the time-share plan but does not include the specific right to use any particular accommodations;

(21)

“Time-share property” means:

(A)

One (1) or more accommodations and related amenities that are subject to a time-share instrument; and

(B)

Any other property or property rights appurtenant to the accommodations and amenities; and

(22)

“Time-share use” means any arrangement under which the purchaser receives a right to occupy a time-share property but does not receive a time-share estate.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 1, § 1-103; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1303; Acts 1989, No. 45, § 1; 2013, No. 710, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 45, § 3, provided that the Arkansas Real Estate Commission may promulgate such regulations as it deems necessary for the implementation of this act.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-103. Applicability.

(a)

This chapter applies to a time-share plan established after February 25, 1983, under §18-14-201 et seq., §18-14-401 et seq., and §18-14-501 et seq.

(b)

This chapter does not apply to the offer or sale of a time-share interest if the use extends over a period of three (3) years or less, whether or not the accommodation is located in this state.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 1, § 1-102; 1983, No. 765, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1302; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), substituted “applies to a time-share plan established” for “shall apply to any time-share program created or commenced”, and “under” for “and ninety (90) days thereafter as to any time share program heretofore created or commenced with respect to the requirements of”; and added (b).

18-14-104. Legal status of time-share estates.

(a)(1)

A time-share estate is an estate in real property and has the character and incidents of an estate in fee simple at common law, including an estate for years with a remainder over in fee simple or an estate for years with no remainder if a leasehold.

(2)

This section supersedes any contrary rule at common law.

(b)

A document transferring or encumbering a time-share estate in real property shall not be rejected for recordation because of the nature or duration of that estate or interest.

(c)

For purposes of title, a time-share estate constitutes a separate estate or interest in property, except for real property tax purposes.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 1, §§ 1-104, 1-105; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-1304, 50-1305; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment redesignated (a) as (a)(1) and (2); substituted “including” for “It may include” in (a)(1); substituted “This section supersedes” for “The foregoing shall supersede” in (a)(2); substituted “shall not” for “may not” in (b); and, in (c), deleted “Each time-share estate constitutes” from the beginning and inserted “time-share estate constitutes a”.

18-14-105. Regulatory discrimination prohibited.

A zoning, subdivision, or other ordinance or regulation shall not discriminate against the establishment of time-share interests or impose a requirement upon a time-share plan that it would not impose upon a similar development under a different form of ownership.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 1, § 1-106; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1306; 2013, No. 710, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “shall not” for “may not”, “establishment” for “creation”, “interests” for “intervals”, and “plan that” for “program which”.

Subchapter 2

— Administration and Registration

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 294, § 6-106: Mar. 25, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the protection of the residents of this State that provision be made for the sale and regulation of Time-Share Intervals by the Real Estate Commission; that this Act is designed to provide for such regulation and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 765, § 8: Mar. 24, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of Act 294 of 1983 relating to the regulation of real estate time-share intervals by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission are in urgent need of revision to enable the Commission to effectively and efficiently administer the provisions of the Act; that this Act is designed to make the necessary revisions and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-14-201. Powers and duties of the Arkansas Real Estate Commission.

(a)

The Arkansas Real Estate Commission may:

(1)

Set fees;

(2)

Adopt, amend, and repeal rules;

(3)

Issue orders consistent with this chapter;

(4)

Prescribe forms and procedures for submitting information to the commission;

(5)

Accept grants-in-aid from any governmental source;

(6)

Contract with agencies charged with similar functions in this or other jurisdictions;

(7)

Cooperate with agencies performing similar functions in this and other jurisdictions to develop uniform filing procedures and forms, uniform disclosure standards, and uniform administrative practices;

(8)

Develop information that may be useful in the discharge of the duties of the commission;

(9)

Initiate private investigations within or without this state;

(10)

After notice and a hearing under this chapter and the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.:

(A)

Issue a notice of suspension;

(B)

Impose a civil penalty of no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per occurrence; and

(C)

Assess costs against the person if:

(i)

A representation in any document or information filed with the commission is false or misleading;

(ii)

A developer or agent of a developer has engaged or is engaging in any unlawful act or practice;

(iii)

A developer or agent of a developer has distributed, caused to be distributed, or is distributing, orally or in writing, false or misleading promotional materials concerning a time-share plan;

(iv)

A developer or agent of a developer has concealed, diverted, or disposed of any funds or assets of a person in a way that impairs rights of purchasers of time-share interests in the time-share plan;

(v)

A developer or agent of a developer has failed to perform a stipulation or agreement made to induce the commission to issue an order relating to that time-share plan; or

(vi)

A developer or agent of a developer has otherwise violated this chapter or the rules or orders of the commission;

(11)

Issue a cease and desist order if the developer has not registered the time-share plan under this chapter; and

(12)

After notice and hearing, issue an order revoking the registration of a time-share plan upon a determination that a developer or agent of a developer has failed to comply with a notice of suspension issued by the commission, which order affects the time-share plan.

(b)

In addition to the civil penalties under subdivision (a)(10) of this section, the commission may require the person found to have violated this chapter or the rules or orders of the commission to reimburse any compensation, fees, or other remuneration collected during the activity that resulted in the violation.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 4, § 4-101; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1325; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-202. Registration required.

(a)(1)(A)

A developer shall not offer or dispose of a time-share interest unless the time-share plan is registered with the Arkansas Real Estate Commission.

(B)

However, a developer may accept a reservation together with a deposit if the deposit is:

(i)

Placed in an escrow account with an institution having trust powers; and

(ii)

Refundable to the purchaser at any time.

(2)

A reservation requires a subsequent affirmative act by the purchaser via a separate instrument to establish a binding obligation.

(3)

A developer shall not dispose of or transfer a time-share interest while an order revoking or suspending the registration of the time-share plan is in effect.

(b)(1)

An acquisition agent shall register the time-share plan for which it is providing prospective purchasers with the commission unless there is an effective registration of the plan filed with the commission by the developer.

(2)

An acquisition agent if other than the developer shall furnish to the commission:

(A)

Its principal office address and telephone number;

(B)

The name of its designated responsible managing employee; and

(C)

Any additional information the commission requires including evidence that a bond in an amount determined by the commission but not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) has been placed with a surety company, corporate bond acceptable to the commission, or a cash bond with the commission to cover a violation of any solicitation ordinances, zoning ordinances, building codes, or other regulations governing the use of the premises in which the time-share plan is promoted.

(3)

Each acquisition agent shall renew the registration annually and pay a filing fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the registration and each renewal of the registration.

(c)(1)

A real estate principal broker shall register with the commission the time-share plan that it is selling unless there is an effective registration of the plan filed with the commission by the developer.

(2)

The real estate principal broker if other than the developer shall furnish to the commission:

(A)

Its principal office address and telephone number;

(B)

The name of its designated responsible managing employee;

(C)

Any special escrow accounts set up for the deposit and collection of purchasers' funds; and

(D)

Any additional information the commission requires, including evidence that a bond in an amount determined by the commission but not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) has been placed with a surety company, corporate bond acceptable to the commission, or a cash bond with the commission to cover any defalcations of the real estate principal broker and any of its sales agents.

(3)

Each real estate principal broker shall renew its registration annually and pay a filing fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the registration and each renewal of the registration.

(d)(1)

A managing agent shall register with the commission the time-share plan that it is managing unless there is an effective registration of the plan filed with the commission by the developer.

(2)

The managing agent shall furnish to the commission:

(A)

Its principal office address and telephone number;

(B)

The name of its designated responsible managing employee; and

(C)

Any additional information the commission requires, including evidence that a bond in an amount determined by the commission but not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) has been placed with a surety company, corporate bond acceptable to the commission, or a cash bond with the commission to cover any default of the managing agent of his or her duties and responsibilities.

(3)

Each managing agent shall renew the registration annually and pay a filing fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the registration and each renewal of the registration.

(e)(1)

If the acquisition agent, real estate principal broker, or management agent is under the control of, a subsidiary of, or affiliate of the developer , the bond of the broker or agent whether one (1) or more, can be consolidated and reduced to an amount determined by the commission but not to exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) if there is a disclosure of the affiliation to the commission.

(2)

If the developer registers an additional time-share plan, including additional phases, in the existing time-share plan with the commission, the developer is not required to furnish an additional bond or increase the existing bond for the additional registration if the initial bond remains in effect.

(f)(1)

An exchange agent shall file a statement with the commission containing:

(A)

A list of the time-share plans or properties that it is offering exchange services for;

(B)

Its principal office address and telephone number; and

(C)

The name of its designated responsible managing employee or its contact person.

(2)

Each exchange agent shall renew his or her registration annually and pay a filing fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the registration and each renewal thereof of the registration.

(g)

The acquisition agent and real estate principal broker shall each maintain their respective records of any employees or independent contractors employed by them, their addresses, and the commissions paid for the immediately preceding two (2) calendar years.

(h)

Any interest earned on a bond or a bond substitute, whether cash, certificate of deposit, bank account, security, or other instrument, while on deposit with or for the benefit of the commission becomes the separate property of the commission and is deposited into the Real Estate Recovery Fund in §17-42-403.

(i)

A filing fee may be discounted for an applicant that submits the required filings using the Association of Real Estate License Law Officials' web-based document management program.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 4, § 4-102; 1983, No. 765, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1326; Acts 1989, No. 44, § 1; 2013, No. 710, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 44, § 4, provided that the Arkansas Real Estate Commission may promulgate such regulations as it deems necessary for the implementation of this act.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-203. Abbreviated registration — Exemptions.

(a)

An abbreviated registration with the Arkansas Real Estate Commission may be accepted if the developer is registered and has issued a public offering statement or similar disclosure document that is provided to purchasers under any of the following:

(1)

Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.;

(2)

Arkansas Securities Act, §23-42-101 et seq.;

(3)

Federal Interstate Land Sales Full Disclosure Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1701 et seq., if the time-share plan is made a part of the subdivision that is being registered; and

(4)

Any federal or state act that requires a federal or state agency to review a public offering statement or similar disclosure document that must be distributed to purchasers if the commission determines that the federal or state public offering statement is substantially equivalent to that required by this chapter.

(b)

Annually or when a public offering statement is amended, the public offering statement shall be submitted to the commission for recertification.

(c)

An applicant filing an abbreviated registration shall pay:

(1)

A filing fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500);

(2)

Any necessary investigation expenses as stated in §18-14-204(d); and

(3)

A fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) for each request for recertification under subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

A registration with the commission is not required in the case of:

(1)

A transfer of a time-share interest by any time-share interest owner other than the developer or its agent unless the transfer is made to evade this chapter;

(2)

Any disposition under a court order;

(3)

A disposition by a government or governmental agency;

(4)

A disposition by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure;

(5)

A developer's offer of additional time-share interests in a time-share plan located outside this state to owners that have previously purchased from the developer or a developer under common ownership or control with the developer, if the developer has had a registration or amendment approved by the commission within the preceding seven (7) years;

(6)

A gratuitous transfer of a time-share interest;

(7)

A time-share property that consists of a single accommodation and related amenities for which the developer or a person under the control of, a subsidiary of, or affiliate of the developer operates as the acquisition agent, broker, or exchange agent; or

(8)

A disposition of a time-share interest owned by an owners' association of which the time-share interest is a part.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 4, § 4-107; 1983, No. 765, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1331; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “Abbreviated registration — Exemptions” for “Exemptions from registration” in the section heading; and rewrote the section.

18-14-204. Application for registration.

(a)

An application for registration of a time-share plan shall contain:

(1)

The public offering statement;

(2)

A brief description of the time-share property;

(3)

Copies of time-share instruments;

(4)

Financial statements prepared according to generally accepted accounting principles and fully and fairly disclosing the current financial condition of the developer;

(5)

Any other documents referred to in the registration application; and

(6)

Other information as required by the Arkansas Real Estate Commission.

(b)(1)

If the accommodation in the time-share plan is in a condominium development or other common-interest subdivision, the application for registration shall contain evidence that the use of the accommodation for time-share purposes is not prohibited by the project instruments.

(2)

If the project instruments do not expressly authorize time-sharing, the application for registration shall contain evidence that purchasers in the condominium development or other common-interest subdivision were given written notice at least sixty (60) days before the application for registration was submitted that the accommodation would be used for time-share purposes.

(3)

If the project instruments contain a prohibition against time-sharing, the board of directors of the association shall certify that the amendment procedures in the project instruments were followed and that the project instruments have been amended to permit time-sharing.

(c)

The application shall be accompanied by a filing fee not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d)(1)

The commission shall thoroughly investigate matters relating to the application and may require a personal inspection of the time-share property by a person designated by it.

(2)

All direct expenses incurred by the commission in inspecting the time-share property are paid by the applicant, and the commission may require a deposit sufficient to cover the direct expenses before incurring them.

(e)

An application for registration shall be renewed, annually, and the renewal filing fee shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 4, § 4-103; 1983, No. 765, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1327; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-205. Material changes.

(a)

A developer shall amend or supplement its registration to report a material change in the information required by §18-14-204.

(b)(1)

If there is a material change in a registration document, the developer shall file an amendment with the Arkansas Real Estate Commission to report the material change no later than forty-five (45) days after the developer knows or reasonably should have known of the change.

(2)

The developer may continue to offer and dispose of time-share interests under the existing registration pending review of the amendments by the commission if the developer discloses the material change to prospective purchasers.

(3)

The commission may charge a fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) to process an amendment.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 4, § 4-106; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1330; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (b)(1) through (3).

18-14-206. Effectiveness of registration or amendment.

(a)(1)

Except as otherwise provided, the effective date of the registration or any amendment is forty-five (45) days after its filing or such earlier date as the Arkansas Real Estate Commission may determine, having regard for the public interest and the protection of purchasers.

(2)

If an amendment to a registration is filed before the effective date, the registration is considered to have been filed when the amendment was filed.

(b)(1)

If it appears to the commission that the application for registration or an amendment to the registration is on its face incomplete or inaccurate in any material respect, the commission shall so advise the developer by listing each deficiency in writing before the date the registration would otherwise be effective.

(2)

The notification of the deficiency serves to suspend the effective date of the filing until ten (10) days after the developer files the additional information as required by the commission.

(3)(A)

Any developer, upon receipt of the notice of deficiencies, may request a hearing.

(B)

The hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days of receipt of the request.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 4, § 4-105; 1983, No. 765, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1329; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-207. Regulation and use of public offering statement.

(a)(1)

The Arkansas Real Estate Commission may require a developer to alter or supplement the form or substance of a public offering statement to assure adequate and accurate disclosure to prospective purchasers.

(2)

The commission may require that certain disclosures contained in the public offering statement be in boldface type to protect the purchaser.

(b)(1)

The public offering statement shall not be used for promotional purposes before registration and may be used afterwards only in its entirety.

(2)

A person shall not advertise that the commission has approved or recommended the time-share plan, the disclosure statement, or any of the documents contained in the application for registration.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 4, § 4-104; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1328; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment subdivided (a) and (b); substituted “Arkansas Real Estate Commission” for “agency” in (a)(1); in (a)(2), substituted “The commission” for “In order to ensure adequate protection of the purchaser through disclosure, the agency”, deleted “placed” preceding “in boldface” and added “to protect the purchaser” to the end; in (b)(1), substituted “shall not” for “may not”, deleted “any” preceding “promotional”, “the statement” preceding “may be used”, and “if it is used” following “only”; and, in (b)(2), substituted “A person shall not advertise that the commission” for “No person may advertise or represent that the agency” and “plan” for “program”.

Subchapter 3

— Creation, Termination, and Management

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 294, § 6-106: Mar. 25, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the protection of the residents of this State that provision be made for the sale and regulation of Time-Share Intervals by the Real Estate Commission; that this Act is designed to provide for such regulation and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-14-301. Time-share plans permitted.

A time-share plan may be established in any accommodation unless expressly prohibited by the project instruments.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 2, § 2-101; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1308; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “plans” for “programs” in the section heading; and substituted “plan” for “program”, “established” for “created” and “accommodation” for “unit”.

18-14-302. Contents of instruments establishing time-share estates.

A project and time-share instrument that establishes a time-share estate located or offered in this state shall contain:

(1)

The name of the county in which the property is situated;

(2)

The legal description, street address, or other description sufficient to identify the property;

(3)

Identification of time periods by letter, name, number, or combination thereof;

(4)

Identification of time-share estates and, when applicable, the method by which additional time-share estates may be established;

(5)

The formula, fraction, or percentage of the common expenses and any voting rights assigned to each time-share estate and, when applicable, to each accommodation in a project that is not subject to the time-share plan;

(6)

Restrictions on the use, occupancy, alteration, or alienation of time-share interests;

(7)

The ownership interest, if any, in personal property and for care and replacement;

(8)

Any other matters the developer considers appropriate; and

(9)(A)

Provisions concerning the establishment of a lien against an owner's time-share interest in favor of the association of time-share estate owners to secure payment of common expenses.

(B)

This lien when provided for in the time-share instrument is enforceable and foreclosable in the way other statutory liens are enforceable and foreclosable under the laws of this state.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 2, § 2-102; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1309; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “establishing” for “creating” in the section heading; rewrote the introductory language; in (4), substituted “when” for “where”, “by which” for “whereby”, and “established” for “created”; in (5), substituted “when” for “where”, “accommodation” for “unit”, and “plan” for “program”; in (6), substituted “Restrictions” for “Any restrictions” and
“interests” for “intervals”; substituted “considers” for “deems” in (8); subdivided (9) as (9)(A) and (9)(B); substituted “Provisions concerning” for “Any provisions pertaining to” in (9)(A); and, in (9)(B), substituted “is” for “shall be” and “way” for “same manner in which”.

18-14-303. Provisions for management and operation of time-share estate plans.

The time-share instruments for a time-share estate plan offered in this state shall prescribe reasonable arrangements for management and operation of the time-share plan or time-share property and for the maintenance, repair, and furnishing of accommodations including:

(1)

Establishment of an association of time-share estate owners;

(2)

Adoption of bylaws for organizing and operating the association;

(3)

Payment of costs and expenses of operating the time-share plan or time-share property and owning and maintaining the accommodations;

(4)

Employment and termination of employment of the managing agent for the association;

(5)

Preparation and dissemination to owners of information concerning the time-share plan or property, including:

(A)

An annual budget;

(B)

Operating statements; and

(C)

Other financial information;

(6)

Procedures for establishing the rights of owners for the use of accommodations by prearrangement or under a first-reserved, first-served system;

(7)

Adoption of standards and rules of conduct for the use and occupancy of accommodations by owners;

(8)

Collection of assessments from owners to defray the expenses of management of the time-share plan or time-share property and maintenance of the accommodation and amenities of the time-share plan or time-share property;

(9)

Comprehensive general liability insurance for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of, or in connection with, the use of the accommodations by owners, their guests, and other users;

(10)

Methods for providing compensating use periods or monetary compensation to an owner if an accommodation cannot be made available for the period to which the owner is entitled by schedule or by confirmed reservation; and

(11)(A)

Procedures for imposing a monetary penalty or suspension of an owner's rights and privileges in the time-share plan for failure of the owner to comply with the time-share instruments or the rules of the association concerning the use of the accommodations and amenities.

(B)

Under these procedures an owner shall be given notice and the opportunity to refute or explain the charges against him or her in person or in writing to the governing body of the association before a decision to impose discipline is rendered.

(C)

A monetary penalty may be secured by the lien in §18-14-302.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 2, § 2-103; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1310; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-14-304. Developer control period.

(a)

The time-share instruments for a time-share estate plan may provide for a length of time, known as the “developer control period”, during which the developer, or a managing agent selected by the developer, may manage the time-share plan and the accommodations in the time-share plan.

(b)

If the time-share instruments for a time-share estate plan provide for the establishment of a developer control period, the procedure shall ordinarily include:

(1)

Termination of the developer control period by action of the association or by operation of the time-share instruments;

(2)

Termination of contracts for goods and services for the time-share plan or for accommodations in the time-share plan during the developer control period; and

(3)

A regular accounting by the developer to the association concerning matters that significantly affect the interests of owners in the time-share plan.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 2, § 2-104; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1311; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “plan” for “program” and “accommodations” for “units” throughout the section; in (a), substituted “length” for “period” and “known” for “hereafter referred to”; substituted “the procedure shall ordinarily include” for “they shall ordinarily include provisions for the following” in (b); added “or by operation of the time-share instruments” in (b)(1); deleted “entered into” preceding “during” in (b)(2); and substituted “concerning” for “as to all” in (b)(3).